zh-CN: 适用主板形状因子: ATX; 扩展 ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; 其他
ja: 互換性のあるマザーボードのフォームファクタ: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; その他
hu: Kompatibilis alaplap formája: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Egyéb
nl: Compatibele moederbordvormfactor: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Andere
sk-SK: Kompatibilný formát základnej dosky: ATX; Rozšírené ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Iné
el: Συμβατός παράγοντας μορφής μητρικής πλακέτας: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Άλλο
fi: Yhteensopivan emolevyn muotokerroin: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Muu
nb: Kompatibel hovedkortformfaktor: ATX; Utvidet ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Annen
vi: Hệ số hình dạng bảng mạch chính tương thích: ATX; ATX mở rộng; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Khác
de: Kompatibler Motherboard-Formfaktor: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 相容主機板外形尺寸: ATX; E-ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; 其他
it: Fattore di forma della scheda madre compatibile: ATX; ATX esteso; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Altro
th: ฟอร์มแฟกเตอร์ของเมนบอร์ดที่รองรับ: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Съвместим типоразмер на дънната платка: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Други
ru: Совместимые форм-факторы материнских плат: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Другое
ro-RO: Formă placă de bază compatibilă: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Altele
es: Factor de forma de placa base compatible: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Otros
fr: Facteur de forme de la carte mère compatible: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Autre
pl: Zgodny współczynnik kształtu płyty głównej: ATX; Rozszerzony ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Fator de forma da placa-mãe compatível: ATX; ATX Estendido; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Outro
sv: Kompatibel moderkortsformfaktor: ATX; Utökad ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Annat
tr: Uyumlu Anakart Form Faktörü: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Diğer
en: Compatible motherboard form factor: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Other
pt-PT: Fator de forma da placa-mãe compatível: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Outro
da: Kompatibel bundkortformfaktor: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilni format hardvera matične ploče: ATX; Prošireni ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Ostalo
ko: 호환 가능한 마더보드 폼 팩터: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; 기타
sl-SI: Združljiv faktor oblike matične plošče: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Drugo
lt-LT: Suderinamas pagrindinės plokštės formatas: ATX; „Extended ATX“; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Kita
cs: Kompatibilní form factor základní desky: ATX; Extended ATX; FlexATX; Micro-ATX; Mini-DTX; Mini-ITX; Nano-ITX; Jiné